Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1764.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 175, O.S.L.
2024 (64 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 1097), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 1097. A. As used in this section, "unauthorized camp"
means any tent, shelter, or bedding constructed or arranged for the
purpose of or in such a way to permit overnight use on a property
not designated as a campsite.
B. Persons may not use state-owned, county-owned, or municipal-
owned lands for the purposes of establishing an unauthorized camp.
C. Any person who violates the provisions of this section
shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1764 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

fine not to exceed Fifty Dollars ($50.00) or by imprisonment in the
county jail not to exceed fifteen (15) days, or by both such fine
and imprisonment. However, a person who commits a first violation
of this section shall be issued a warning, and a citation may not be
issued unless the person refuses any assistance offered to them by
the arresting officer. Such assistance may include, but is not
limited to, transportation to a shelter, food pantry, or other place
where resources are made available to assist the indigent and
homeless.
D. The governing body of any county or municipality may opt out
of this section by a majority vote of the governing body.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON LOCAL AND COUNTY GOVERNMENT
April 15, 2025 - DO PASS











SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1764 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)